District of Columbia statutes.
42-2702.01

Creation; purpose.

The District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency is created as a corporate body which has a legal existence separate from the government of the District but which is an instrumentality of the government of the District created to effectuate certain public purposes.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 201, 25 DCR 5008

Cross References

District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency, membership disclosure of interests, see § 1-1106.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2111.
1973 Ed., § 45-1903.

Editor's Notes

Appropriations approved: Public Law 101-518, 104 Stat. 2227, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1991, provided that up to $275,000 within the 15% set-aside for special programs within the Tenant Assistance Program shall be targeted for the single-room occupancy initiative.

Repayment by D.C. Housing Finance Agency: Section 147 of Pub. Law 104-194 provided that, notwithstanding any other law, the District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency, shall not be required to repay moneys advanced by the District government (including accrued interest thereon) pursuant to Congressional appropriations for fiscal years 1980 through 1992.